Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.060

Supervisory directive or corrective action order—Conservator.

(1) If the director determines that a state trust company has failed to comply with the lawful requirements imposed by such supervisory directive or corrective action order, the director may by order, with or without consent of the state trust company, appoint a conservator for the state trust company, who shall immediately take charge of such state trust company and all of its property, books, records, and effects.

(2) The conservator shall conduct the business of the state trust company and take such steps toward the removal of the causes and conditions which necessitated such order of conservatorship, as the director may specify in the order.

(3) During the pendency of the conservatorship, the conservator shall make such reports to the director from time to time as may be required by the director, and shall be empowered to take all necessary measures to preserve, protect, and recover any assets or property of such state trust company, including claims or causes of actions belonging to or which may be asserted by such state trust company, and to deal with the same in his or her own name as conservator, and shall be empowered to file, prosecute, and defend any suit and suits which have been filed or which may be filed by or against such state trust company that are deemed by the conservator to be necessary to protect all of the interested parties for a property affected thereby.

(4) The director, an assistant director or other officer of the department, or an independent contractor appointed by the director may be appointed to serve as conservator.

(5) If, after issuance of the order of conservatorship, the director determines, after consultation with the conservator, that the state trust company is in an unsafe and unsound condition and ought not to continue business, the director may proceed to give advance notice to and take possession of the state trust company for involuntary liquidation pursuant to chapter 30B.44B RCW.

(6) The director, in his or her capacity as a conservator, or any other person appointed as conservator by the director, pursuant to this chapter is immune from criminal, civil, and administrative liability for any act done in good faith in the performance of the duties of conservator.

[ 2019 c 389 s 85.]